Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-209.01
Gaming manager, defined.

Gaming manager shall mean any person who is licensed by a Class II bingo licensee to be responsible for the supervision and operation of all gaming activities authorized and regulated under Chapter 9 which are conducted at the bingo occasions of a Class II bingo licensee.

Laws 1988, LB 295, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 13.